Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1807
Inquest; witnesses; oath.

An oath shall be administered to the witnesses in substance as follows: You do solemnly swear that the testimony which you shall give to this inquest, concerning the death of the person here lying dead, shall be the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth, so help you God.

Laws 1879, § 103, p. 382;

R.S.1913, § 5669;

C.S.1922, § 4999;

C.S.1929, § 26-1508;

R.S.1943, § 23-1807.